Utah statutes.
59-7-507.   Payment of tax.
(1) (a)  If quarterly estimated payments are not made as provided in Section
59-7-504, the amount of tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid no later
than the original due date of the return.
(b)  If an extension of time is necessary for filing a return, as provided in
Subsection 59-7-505(3) or Section 59-7-803, payment must be made no later than
the original due date of the return in an amount equal to the lesser of:
(i)  The greater of:
(A)  90% of the total tax reported on the return for the current taxable year;
or
(B)  100% of the minimum tax described in Section 59-7-104; or
(ii)  100% of the total tax liability for the taxable year immediately
preceding the current taxable year.
(c)  If payment is not made as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the commission
shall add an extension penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401, until the tax
is paid during the period of extension.
(2) (a)  At the request of the taxpayer, the commission may extend the time
for payment of the amount determined as the tax by the taxpayer, or any part
of that amount, for a period not to exceed six months from the date prescribed
for the payment of the tax.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a), the amount in respect of which the
extension is granted shall be paid on or before the date of the expiration of
the period of the extension.
